Florida, session 2026, SB218.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSection 28 of chapter 2025-190, Laws of Florida, 11 is amended to read: 12 Section 28.â(1)âAs used in this section, the term 13 âimpacted local governmentâ means a county listed in the Federal 14 Disaster Declaration for Hurricane Debby (DR-4806), Hurricane 15 Helene (DR-4828), or Hurricane Milton (DR-4834) which was 16 designated or within which a tribal area was designated as 17 eligible for both individual assistance and public assistance 18 under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency 19 Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. ss. 5121 et seq., and each 20 municipality within one of those counties. 21 (2)âAn impacted local government Each county listed in the 22 Federal Disaster Declaration for Hurricane Debby (DR-4806), 23 Hurricane Helene (DR-4828), or Hurricane Milton (DR-4834), and 24 each municipality within one of those counties, may not propose 25 or adopt any moratorium on construction, reconstruction, or 26 redevelopment of any property damaged by Hurricane Debby, 27 Hurricane Helene, or Hurricane Milton such hurricanes; propose 28 or adopt more restrictive or burdensome amendments to its 29 comprehensive plan or land development regulations; or propose 30 or adopt more restrictive or burdensome procedures concerning 31 review, approval, or issuance of a site plan, development 32 permit, or development order, to the extent that those terms are 33 defined by s. 163.3164, Florida Statutes, before October 1, 34 2027, and any such moratorium or restrictive or burdensome 35 comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or 36 procedure shall be null and void ab initio. This subsection 37 applies retroactively to August 1, 2024. 38 (3)(2)âNotwithstanding subsection (2) (1), any 39 comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation 40 amendment, site plan, development permit, or development order 41 approved or adopted by an impacted local government a county or 42 municipality before or after the effective date of this act may 43 be enforced if: 44 (a)âThe associated application is initiated by a private 45 party other than the impacted local government county or 46 municipality. 47 (b)âThe property that is the subject of the application is 48 owned by the initiating private party. 49 (4)(a)(3)(a)âA resident of or the owner of a business in an 50 impacted local government a county or municipality may bring a 51 civil action for declaratory and injunctive relief against the 52 impacted local government county or municipality for a violation 53 of this section. Pending adjudication of the action and upon 54 filing of a complaint showing a violation of this section, the 55 resident or business owner is entitled to a preliminary 56 injunction against the impacted local government county or 57 municipality preventing implementation of the moratorium or the 58 comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or 59 procedure. If such civil action is successful, the resident or 60 business owner is entitled to reasonable attorney fees and 61 costs. 62 (b)âAttorney fees and costs and damages may not be awarded 63 pursuant to this subsection if: 64 1.âThe resident or business owner provides the governing 65 body of the impacted local government county or municipality 66 written notice that a proposed or enacted moratorium, 67 comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or 68 procedure is in violation of this section; and 69 2.âThe governing body of the impacted local government 70 county or municipality withdraws the proposed moratorium, 71 comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or 72 procedure within 14 days; or, in the case of an adopted 73 moratorium, comprehensive plan amendment, land development 74 regulation, or procedure, the governing body of an impacted 75 local government a county or municipality notices an intent to 76 repeal within 14 days after receipt of the notice and repeals 77 the moratorium, comprehensive plan amendment, land development 78 regulation, or procedure within 14 days thereafter. 79 (5)(4)âThis section expires June 30, 2028. 80 Section 2.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 28 of 81 chapter 2025-190, Laws of Florida, apply retroactively to August 82 1, 2024. 83 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.